Hawaii statutes.
[§661-29] Fees and costs of litigation.
The State shall not be liable for expenses or fees, including attorney fees,
that a person incurs in bringing an action under this part and shall not elect
to pay those expenses or fees. [L 2000, c 126, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next